Washington statutes.
RCW 4.12.040

Disqualification of judge, transfer to another department, visiting judge—Change of venue generally, criminal cases.

(1) No judge of a superior court of the state of Washington shall sit to hear or try any action or proceeding if that judge has been disqualified pursuant to RCW 4.12.050. In such case the presiding judge in judicial districts where there is more than one judge shall forthwith transfer the action to another department of the same court, or call in a judge from some other court. In all judicial districts where there is only one judge, a certified copy of the notice of disqualification filed in the cause shall be transmitted by the clerk of the superior court to the clerk of the superior court designated by the chief justice of the supreme court. Upon receipt the clerk of said superior court shall transmit the forwarded notice to the presiding judge who shall direct a visiting judge to hear and try such action as soon as convenient and practical.

(2) The presiding judge in judicial districts where there is more than one judge, or the presiding judge of judicial districts where there is only one judge, may send a case for trial to another court if the convenience of witnesses or the ends of justice will not be interfered with by such a course and the action is of such a character that a change of venue may be ordered: PROVIDED, That in criminal prosecutions the case shall not be sent for trial to any court outside the county unless the accused shall waive his or her right to a trial by a jury of the county in which the offense is alleged to have been committed.

(3) This section does not apply to water right adjudications filed under chapter 90.03 or 90.44 RCW. Disqualification of judges in water right adjudications is governed by RCW 90.03.620.

[ 2017 c 42 s 1; 2009 c 332 s 19; 1989 c 15 s 1; 1961 c 303 s 1; 1927 c 145 s 1; 1911 c 121 s 1; RRS s 209-1.]

NOTES:

Application—2009 c 332: See note following RCW 90.03.110.

Criminal proceedings, venue and jurisdiction: Chapter 10.25 RCW.